California statutes. Public Resources Code
The closure plan and the postclosure maintenance plan shall be submitted not later than the first date after July 1, 1990, that the solid waste facilities permit is required to be reviewed or revised pursuant to Section 44015. The closure plans and postclosure maintenance plans shall be included in that review. If the owner or operator intends to close the solid waste landfill on or before September 28, 1992, or if the solid waste landfill does not have sufficient permitted capacity to operate after September 28, 1992, the owner or operator shall submit the plans on or before July 1, 1990, or upon application to become an operator of a solid waste facility pursuant to Section 44001.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1293, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

43504.

Pursuant to the procedural requirements in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 44001), the enforcement agency or the board may suspend or revoke a permit if the applicant fails within a reasonable period of time to submit an acceptable plan for the closure of the landfill and an acceptable plan for postclosure maintenance of the landfill.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

43505.

The closure plan and the postclosure maintenance plan may be revised only upon the filing of a written application therefor by the owner or operator, and the approval, or amendment and approval, by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

43506.

(a) After receiving a complete closure plan and postclosure maintenance plan, the regional water board shall approve or disapprove the plans pursuant to the authority and time schedules specified in Division 7 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Water Code. The board shall incorporate the action of the regional water board and shall only approve plans that include an acceptable mechanism for providing the necessary funds to implement the plans.

(b) In reviewing closure plans and postclosure maintenance plans pursuant to this section, the regional water boards shall review and take action on those portions of the plans which are related to the protection of the waters of the state and the board shall review and take action on the remaining portions of the plans.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 656, Sec. 22.   Effective October 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

43507.

The owner and operator shall, regardless of any changes occurring during the continued operation of the landfill, close and maintain the landfill during postclosure in accordance with the most recent closure plan and the most recent postclosure maintenance plan approved by the board pursuant to this article. Upon receipt of the final shipment of solid waste, the most recent closure and postclosure maintenance plan shall become the governing document for the disposal site.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 952, Sec. 14.   Effective October 16, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

43508.

The board or the enforcement agency may recover any costs incurred in meeting the requirements of this article by charging a fee pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 41900) of Part 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1293, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

43509.

(a) The board, in consultation with the state water board and in compliance with Section 40055, shall adopt and amend regulations specifying closure plan and postclosure maintenance plan adoption procedures and uniform standards to implement Section 43601. Regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall not include standards and requirements contained in regulations adopted by the State Water Resources Control Board pursuant to Division 7 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Water Code. The regulations shall also require solid waste landfill owners or operators to calculate, and periodically revise, cost estimates for closure and for postclosure maintenance, for as long as the solid waste could have an adverse effect on the quality of the waters of the state, but not less than 30 years after closure unless all wastes are removed in accordance with federal and state law.

(b) The board may adopt regulations that authorize the adoption of both preliminary and final closure and postclosure maintenance plans. Regulations for preliminary closure and postclosure maintenance plans may require less specificity and engineering detail than final closure and postclosure maintenance plans, and these regulations shall apply only in those cases in which there is reasonable certainty that the solid waste landfill will not close for at least one year following approval of the plans. Preliminary closure and postclosure maintenance plans shall provide sufficient detail to enable the owner or operator and the board to accurately estimate the costs for closure and postclosure maintenance.

(c) If a solid waste landfill owner or operator has submitted a closure plan and postclosure maintenance plan which satisfies the requirements of this chapter, and which has been approved by the local enforcement agency, the board, and the appropriate regional water board, the plans shall be deemed to have satisfactorily complied with all state requirements for the adoption of a closure plan and postclosure maintenance plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 656, Sec. 23.   Effective October 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

43510.

(a)The regulations adopted by the board pursuant to this article and Article 4 (commencing with Section 43600) shall not duplicate or conflict with the regulations imposing closure and postclosure maintenance requirements adopted by the state water board which are found in Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 2510) of Chapter 3 of Title 23 of the California Code of Regulations.

(b) On or before June 30, 1995, the board and the state water board shall revise the regulations adopted pursuant to this article and Article 4 (commencing with Section 43600) of this chapter and Section 13172 of the Water Code for the purpose of consolidating the requirements of the board and the state water board for closure and postclosure maintenance into one set of regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 656, Sec. 24.   Effective October 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Financial Ability [43600. - 43610.1.]

43600.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), any person owning or operating a solid waste landfill, as defined in Section 40195.1, shall, with the closure plan and postclosure maintenance plan submitted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 43501, submit to the board evidence of financial ability to provide for the cost of closure and postclosure maintenance, in an amount that is equal to the estimated cost of closure and 15 years of postclosure maintenance, contained in the closure plan and the postclosure maintenance plan submitted.

(b) On and after the effective date of the federal regulations set forth in Subpart G (commencing with Section 258.70) of Part 258 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations, any person owning or operating a solid waste landfill, shall, with the closure plan and postclosure maintenance plan submitted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 43501, submit to the board evidence of financial ability to provide for closure and postclosure maintenance, in an amount that is equal to the estimated cost of closure and 30 years of postclosure maintenance, contained in the closure plan and the postclosure maintenance plan submitted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1041, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

43601.

(a) The evidence of financial ability shall be sufficient to meet the closure and postclosure maintenance costs when needed.

(b) The owner or operator of a solid waste landfill shall provide evidence of financial ability through the use of any of the mechanisms set forth in Part 258 (commencing with Section 258.1) of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations or through the use of any other mechanisms approved by the department. However, the department may adopt regulations that reasonably condition the use of one or more of those mechanisms to ensure adequate protection of public health and safety and the environment, but shall not exclude the use of any
 mechanism permitted under federal law. In addition, the evidence of financial ability submitted pursuant to Section 43600 shall provide that funds shall be available to the regional water boards upon the issuance of any order under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 13300) of Division 7 of the Water Code to implement closure and postclosure activities.

(c) The state water board or the appropriate regional water board shall have access to the financial assurance funds for closure and postclosure activities, and to financial assurance funds for corrective action, as necessary, to address water quality problems, if the owner or operator of the solid waste landfill has failed to implement the required closure and postclosure activities or corrective action activities.

(d) The
 owner or operator may request disbursement for expenditures to conduct closure, postclosure maintenance, or corrective actions from the financial assurance mechanism established for that activity. Requests for disbursement shall be granted by the department only if sufficient funds are remaining in the financial assurance mechanism to cover the remaining approved total costs of closure, postclosure maintenance, or corrective actions, as appropriate.

(e) If the evidence of financial ability for closure, postclosure, or corrective action is demonstrated by use of insurance, the department may approve the insurance mechanism if it is in compliance with either paragraph (1) or (2) as follows:

(1) The issuer of the insurance policy is either:

(A) Licensed by the Department of Insurance to transact the business of insurance in the State of California as an admitted carrier.

(B) Eligible to provide insurance as an excess and surplus lines insurer in California through a surplus lines broker currently licensed under the regulations of the Department of Insurance and upon the terms and conditions prescribed by the Department of Insurance.

(2) If the insurance carrier is established by a solid waste facility operator to meet the financial assurance obligations of that operator, insurance may be approved by the department that meets all of the following requirements:

(A) The insurance mechanism is in full compliance with the requirements for
 insurance that are specified in subdivision (d) of Section 258.74 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(B) The insurance carrier is an insurer domiciled in the United States and licensed in its state of domicile to write that insurance.

(C) The insurance carrier only provides financial assurance to the operator that has established the insurance carrier as a form of self-insurance and does not engage in the business of marketing, brokering, or providing insurance coverage to other parties.

(D) The insurance carrier shall maintain a rating of A- or better by A.M. Best, or other equivalent rating by any other agency acceptable to the department.

(E) If
 requested by the department, an independent financial audit report evaluating the assets and liabilities of the insurance carrier and confirming compliance with the statutory and regulatory requirements of the state of domicile and an independent actuarial opinion on the independence and financial soundness of the insurance carrier by an actuary in good standing with the Casualty Actuarial Society or the American Academy of Actuaries regarding the adequacy of the loss reserves maintained by the insurance carrier shall be submitted to the department upon application and annually thereafter.

(f) A solid waste facility operator using or proposing to use an insurance company to demonstrate financial assurance may be required by the department to pay a fee for the actual and necessary
 cost of reviewing information submitted by the operator pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) up to an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), unless a higher amount is mutually agreed to by the operator and the department.

(g) The funds collected pursuant to subdivision (f) shall be deposited in the Integrated Waste Management Account and shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for expenditure by the department to fund the review specified in subdivision (f).

(h) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2018.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 713, Sec. 4.   (AB 480)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Section operative January 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

43601.2.

(a) On or before January 1, 2017, the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery shall submit to the Legislature a report on the use of the mechanisms pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 43601 for demonstrating financial ability to provide for the cost of closure and postclosure maintenance. The report shall,
 at a minimum, address all of the following:

(1) A summary of any ratings reports, audit finding, or other information regarding an owner or operator using financial mechanisms pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 43601 to provide financial assurance.

(2) Whether
 financial mechanisms pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 43601 provide adequate financial assurance to provide for the costs of solid waste landfill closure and postclosure maintenance.

(3) The level of assurance provided by financial mechanisms pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 43601 relative to other mechanisms permitted pursuant to Section 43601.

(4) Any financial liability the state may assume if the mechanisms permitted pursuant to Section 43601 fail.

(5) Any recommendations for ensuring solid waste landfill closure and postclosure maintenance costs are properly assured to protect the state from long-term postclosure and corrective action costs in the event that a landfill owner or operator fails to meet its legal obligations.

(b) (1) The department may consult with the
 Department of Insurance for the purposes of completing the report required by subdivision (a).

(2) By March 1, 2013, the department shall make public an estimate of the costs of the study necessary to complete the report required by subdivision (a). The costs of the study are not subject to the limitations set forth in subdivision (g) of Section 43601.

(3) This subdivision does not preclude the department from recovering costs in excess of this estimate from an owner or operator of a solid waste landfill that is utilizing insurance under paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 43601.

(4) An owner or operator of a solid waste landfill shall not use insurance under paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 43601 as evidence of sufficient financial ability as required by subdivision (a) of Section 43601, unless
 the department has received private funds equal to the department’s estimated costs.

(c) If the department enters into a contract with an entity to conduct the study necessary to complete the report required by subdivision (a), no person or entity that has provided funds for the study shall have input as to the terms of the contract or the awarded contractor. In awarding the contract, the department shall consider and disclose any past or current relationship that the contractor has had with an owner or operator of a solid waste landfill that may use the insurance mechanism allowed under paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 43601.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 713, Sec. 5.   (AB 480)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

43601.5.

(a) On or before March 1, 1994, the board shall review and revise regulations affecting solid waste landfill closure and postclosure financial assurances adopted in accordance with this article to make the regulations consistent with the requirements established pursuant to Subpart G (commencing with Section 258.1) of Part 258 of Subchapter I of Chapter 1 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as amended on October 9, 1991.

(b) In reviewing and revising regulations pursuant to subdivision (a), the board shall, consistent with this division, and with federal law and regulations, endeavor to minimize the costs of compliance with those regulations by the owners and operators of public solid waste landfills and to provide flexible mechanisms for those owners and operators to comply with closure and postclosure financial assurance requirements, in order to ensure that adequate funding will be available for programs and projects that are necessary to comply with the diversion requirements of Section 41780.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 360, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

43602.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), evidence of financial ability required of an owner or operator of a solid waste landfill, as defined in Section 40195.1, shall be adjusted to equal the estimated costs of closure and 15 years of postclosure maintenance in the approved plans. Revisions in the plans prior to closure shall be accompanied by corresponding revisions in cost estimates and financial assurances.

(b) On and after the effective date of the federal regulations set forth in Subpart G (commencing with Section 258.70) of Part 258 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the evidence of financial ability required of an owner or operator of a solid waste landfill shall be adjusted to equal the estimated costs of closure and 30 years of postclosure maintenance in the approved plans. Revisions in the plans prior to closure shall be accompanied by corresponding revisions in cost estimates and financial assurances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1041, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

43603.

The board shall not require an owner or operator of a disposal site to revise or amend a closure plan submitted pursuant to this section or former Section 66796.22 of the Government Code after closure of the landfill in order to reflect subsequent changes in any standards and regulations adopted by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1062, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

43604.

(a) During the closure and postclosure maintenance period, a solid waste landfill owner or operator shall maintain evidence of financial ability sufficient to pay postclosure maintenance costs, except that the owner or operator may request reimbursement for costs of postclosure maintenance as they are incurred if the remaining amount of funds is at least equal to the remaining postclosure maintenance cost.

(b) Notwithstanding the effective date of this section, owners and operators shall be required to comply with this section on the effective date of those regulations set forth in Part 258 (commencing with Section 258.1) of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1169, Sec. 16.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

43605.

Nothing in this division affects the authority of the State Water Resources Control Board to impose closure and postclosure maintenance requirements on disposal sites.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1062, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

43606.

(a) Except for financial arrangements approved by the board pursuant to this article, no indemnification, hold harmless, or similar agreement or conveyance is effective to transfer from the owner or operator of a disposal site to any other person any obligations imposed on the owner or operator under this article.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), nothing in this section prohibits any agreement between the owner and the operator regarding their respective obligations for closure and postclosure maintenance of a disposal site, and nothing in this section prohibits a cause of action that an owner or operator has or would have against the other party by reason of that agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1062, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

43610.

(a) Notwithstanding Article 3 (commencing with Section 43500) or this article, a small city which operates a solid waste landfill, as defined in Section 40195.1, in Kings County, that is operational and, as of January 1, 1991, has been granted all required permits, is not required to submit a postclosure maintenance plan or to provide a fund for postclosure maintenance pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 43500) or this article, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The city has a population of less than 20,000 persons.

(2) The solid waste landfill receives less than 20,000 tons of solid waste per year.

(3) The water table of the highest aquifer under the solid waste landfill is 250 or more feet below the base of the solid waste landfill and the water in the highest aquifer is not potable.

(4) The solid waste landfill receives less than an average of 12 inches of rainfall per year.

(5) The solid waste landfill is closed in compliance with all state closure testing requirements at the time of closure.

(b) The exemption in subdivision (a) from the requirement to submit a postclosure maintenance plan shall become inoperative on the effective date of the federal regulations set forth in Subpart F (commencing with Section 258.60) of Part 258 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and the exemption in subdivision (a) from the requirement to provide a fund for postclosure maintenance shall become inoperative on the effective date of the federal regulations set forth in Subpart G (commencing with Section 258.70) of Part 258 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1041, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

43610.1.

A disposal site owner or operator who meets the requirements of this article and its implementing regulations shall be deemed to have satisfactorily complied with all state requirements for financial ability to provide for closure and postclosure maintenance costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 656, Sec. 25.   Effective October 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Permit and Inspection Program [44000.5. - 44210.]



  ARTICLE 1. Solid Waste Facility Permits [44000.5. - 44019.]

44000.5.

(a) With respect only to solid waste disposed of in this state, a person shall not dispose of solid waste, cause solid waste to be disposed of, arrange for the disposal of solid waste, transport solid waste for purposes of disposal, or accept solid waste for disposal, except at a solid waste disposal facility for which a solid waste facilities permit has been issued pursuant to this chapter or as otherwise authorized pursuant to this division and the regulations adopted by the board pursuant to this division.

(b) A violation of this section is an unlawful act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 500, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

44001.

Any person who proposes to become an operator of a solid waste facility shall file with the enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the facility, or the board if there is no designated and certified enforcement agency, an application for a solid waste facilities permit at least 150 days in advance of the date on which it is desired to commence operation, unless the enforcement agency issues a permit to the applicant to commence operations prior to that time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 952, Sec. 15.   Effective October 16, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

44002.

(a) (1) No person shall operate a solid waste facility without a solid waste facilities permit if that facility is required to have a permit pursuant to this division.

(2) The prohibition specified in paragraph (1) includes, but is not limited to, the operation of a solid waste facility without a required solid waste facilities permit or the operation of a solid waste facility outside the permitted boundaries specified in a solid waste facilities permit.

(b) If the enforcement agency determines that a person is operating a solid waste facility in violation of subdivision (a), the enforcement agency shall immediately issue a cease and desist order pursuant to Section 45005 ordering the facility to immediately cease all activities for which a solid waste facilities permit is required and desist from those activities until the person obtains a valid solid waste facilities permit authorizing the activities or has obtained other authorization pursuant to this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 448, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

44003.

When the operator of the disposal site is not the disposal site owner, the disposal site operator’s application for a solid waste facilities permit shall contain any information that the enforcement agency or the board may require regarding the disposal site owner’s interest in the real property utilized as the disposal site.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1292, Sec. 69.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

44004.

(a) An operator of a solid waste facility shall not make a significant change in the design or operation of the solid waste facility that is not authorized by the existing permit, unless the change is approved by the enforcement agency, the change conforms with this division and all regulations adopted pursuant to this division, and the terms and conditions of the solid waste facilities permit are revised to reflect the change.

(b) If the operator wishes to change the design or operation of the solid waste facility in a manner that is not authorized by the existing permit, the operator shall file an application for revision of the existing solid waste facilities permit with the
 enforcement agency. The application shall be filed at least 180 days in advance of the date when the proposed modification is to take place unless the 180-day time period is waived by the enforcement agency.

(c) The enforcement agency shall review the application to determine all of the following:

(1) Whether the change conforms with this division and all regulations adopted pursuant to this division.

(2) Whether the change requires review pursuant to Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000).

(d) Within 60 days from the date of the receipt of the application for a revised permit, the enforcement agency shall inform the operator, and if the enforcement agency is a local enforcement agency, also inform the department, of its determination to do any of
 the following:

(1) Allow the change without a revision to the permit.

(2) Allow the following changes without a revision to the permit through a modification to the permit allowed pursuant to regulations developed by the department:

(A) The proposed change is to allow a nondisposal facility to increase the amount of solid waste that it may handle and that increased amount is within the existing design capacity as described in the facility’s transfer processing report and review pursuant to Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000).

(B) The proposed change is to allow a disposal facility to add a nondisposal activity to the facility that will increase the amount of solid waste that may be
 handled as described in the facility’s report of facility information and review pursuant to Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000). 

(3) Disallow the change because it does not conform with the requirements of this division or the regulations adopted pursuant to this division.

(4) Require a revision of the solid waste facilities permit to allow the change.

(5) Require review under Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) before a decision is made.

(e) The operator has 30 days within which to appeal the decision of the enforcement agency to the hearing panel, as authorized pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 44305) of Chapter 4. The enforcement agency shall provide notice of a hearing held pursuant to
 this subdivision in the same manner as notice is provided pursuant to subdivision (h).

(f) Under circumstances that present an immediate danger to the public health and safety or to the environment, as determined by the enforcement agency, the 180-day filing period may be waived.

(g) (1) A permit revision is not required for the temporary suspension of activities at a solid waste facility if the suspension meets either of the following criteria:

(A) The suspension is for the maintenance or minor modifications to a solid waste unit or to solid waste management equipment.

(B) The suspension is for temporarily ceasing the receipt of solid waste at a solid waste management facility and the owner or operator is in compliance with all
 other applicable terms and conditions of the solid waste facilities permit and minimum standards adopted by the department.

(2) An owner or operator of a solid waste facility who temporarily suspends operations shall remain subject to the closure and postclosure maintenance requirements of this division and to all other requirements imposed by federal law pertaining to the operation of a solid waste facility.

(3) The enforcement agency may impose any reasonable conditions relating to the maintenance of the solid waste facility, environmental monitoring, and periodic reporting during the period of temporary suspension. The department may also impose any reasonable conditions determined to be necessary to ensure compliance with applicable state standards.

(h) (1) (A) Before
 making its determination pursuant to subdivision (d), the enforcement agency shall submit the proposed determination to the department for comment and hold at least one public hearing on the proposed determination. The enforcement agency shall give notice of the hearing pursuant to Section 65091 of the Government Code, except that the notice shall be provided to all owners of real property within a distance other than 300 feet of the real property that is the subject of the hearing, if specified in the regulations adopted by the department pursuant to subdivision (i). The enforcement agency shall also provide notice of the hearing to the department when it submits the proposed determination to the department.

(B) The enforcement agency shall mail or deliver the notice required pursuant to subparagraph (A) at least 10 days prior to the date of the hearing to any person who has filed a written request for the notice with a person designated by
 the enforcement agency to receive these requests. The enforcement agency may charge a fee to the requester in an amount that is reasonably related to the costs of providing this service and the enforcement agency may require each request to be annually renewed.

(C) The enforcement agency shall consider environmental justice issues when preparing and distributing the notice to ensure that the notice is concise and understandable for limited-English-speaking populations.

(2) If the department comments pursuant to paragraph (1), the department shall specify whether the proposed determination is consistent with the regulation adopted pursuant to subdivision (i).

(i) (1) The department shall, to the extent resources are available, adopt regulations that implement subdivision (h) and define the term
 “significant change in the design or operation of the solid waste facility that is not authorized by the existing permit.”

(2) While formulating and adopting the regulations required pursuant to paragraph (1), the department shall consider recommendations of the Working Group on Environmental Justice and the advisory group made pursuant to Sections 71113 and 71114 and the report required pursuant to Section 71115.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 476, Sec. 14.   (AB 341)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

44005.

(a) Any owner or operator of a solid waste facility who plans to encumber, sell, transfer, or convey the ownership or operations of a solid waste facility or disposal site to a new owner or operator, shall notify the enforcement agency and the board, 45 days prior to the date of the anticipated transfer. The notification shall be in writing and shall include information as determined by the board, including any financial assurances, if applicable.

(b) The enforcement agency and the board shall review the notification documentation and any available records of enforcement actions taken against the proposed transferee, and shall determine, within 30 days of receipt, whether the facility will be operated in compliance with the terms and conditions of an approved permit and any other applicable requirements, including, but not limited to, the requirements of Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000). If the solid waste facility will not be operated in compliance with the terms and conditions of an approved permit, or any other applicable requirements of Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000), the new owner or operator shall be required to file an application for a revised or modified solid waste facilities permit.

(c) If the enforcement agency or the board determines that the facility will be operated in compliance with the terms and conditions of the existing permit, the enforcement agency may change the name of the owner or operator on the permit.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 952, Sec. 20.   Effective October 16, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

44006.

(a) Each report or application filed under this article shall be submitted under oath or under penalty of perjury.

(b) Each report, notice, or application filed under this article shall be submitted on a form approved by the board.

(c) Each application required to be filed under this article shall be accompanied by a filing fee according to a fee schedule established by the enforcement agency to reflect the cost of processing the application and to recover costs incurred in meeting the requirements of Article 3 (commencing with Section 43500) and Article 4 (commencing with Section 43600) of Chapter 2. This fee is in addition to the fees authorized by Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 41900) of Part 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 231, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

44007.

The enforcement agency shall not issue or revise a solid waste facilities permit unless it has, at least 65 days in advance, provided the board and the applicant with a copy of the proposed permit, which shall contain the terms and conditions the enforcement agency proposes to establish.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

44008.

(a) A decision to issue or not issue the permit shall be made by the enforcement agency within 120 days from the date that the application is deemed complete pursuant to Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 65920) of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code, unless waived by the applicant.

(b) The enforcement agency may only issue the permit pursuant to subdivision (a) if it finds that the proposed solid waste facilities permit is consistent with this division and any regulations adopted by the board pursuant to this division applicable to solid waste facilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 952, Sec. 21.   Effective October 16, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

44009.

(a) (1) The board shall, in writing, concur or object to the issuance, modification, or revision of any solid waste facilities permit within 60 days from the date of the board’s receipt of any proposed solid waste facilities permit submitted under Section 44007 after consideration of the issues in this section.

(2) If the board determines that the permit is not consistent with the state minimum standards adopted pursuant to Section 43020, or is not consistent with Sections 43040, 43600, 44007, 44010, 44017, 44150, and 44152 or Division 31 (commencing with Section 50000), the board shall object to provisions of the permit and shall submit those objections to the local enforcement agency for its consideration.

(3) If the board fails to concur or object in writing within the 60-day period specified in paragraph (1), the board shall be deemed to have concurred in the issuance of the permit as submitted to it.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the board is not required to concur in, or object to, and shall not be deemed to have concurred in, the issuance of a solid waste facilities permit for a disposal facility if the owner or operator is not in compliance with, as determined by the regional water board, an enforcement order issued pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 13300) of Division 7 of the Water Code, or if all of the following conditions exist:

(1) Waste discharge requirements for the disposal facility issued by the applicable regional water board are pending review in a petition before the state water board.

(2) The petition for review of the waste discharge requirements includes a request for a stay of the waste discharge requirements.

(3) The state water board has not taken action on the stay request portion of the pending petition for review of waste discharge requirements.

(c) In objecting to the issuance, modification, or revision of any solid waste facilities permit pursuant to this section, the board shall, based on substantial evidence in the record as to the matter before the board, state its reasons for objecting. The board shall not object to the issuance, modification, or revision of any solid waste facilities permit unless the board finds that the permit is not consistent with the state minimum standards adopted pursuant to Section 43020, or is not consistent with Section 43040, 43600, 44007, 44010, 44017, 44150, or 44152 or Division 31 (commencing with Section 50000).

(d) Nothing in this section is intended to require that a solid waste facility obtain a waste discharge permit from a regional water board prior to obtaining a solid waste facilities permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1041, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

44010.

The enforcement agency shall issue the permit only if it finds that the proposed solid waste facilities permit is consistent with the standards adopted by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

44012.

(a) When issuing or revising a solid waste facilities permit, the enforcement agency shall ensure that primary consideration is given to protecting public health and safety and preventing environmental damage, and that the long-term protection of the environment is the guiding
 criterion.

 (b) When issuing or revising a solid waste facilities permit, an enforcement agency may impose those terms and conditions on a solid waste facilities permit that it deems necessary and appropriate to govern the design and operation of the solid waste facility, for purposes of implementing the requirements of subdivision (a).

(c) The terms